South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4743.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 63, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-63-67.  (A) The purpose of this section is to ensure that all public school athletic strength and conditioning programs are conducted safely, effectively, and consistently to student-athletes in public schools in this State to promote injury prevention, performance development, and equitable access for student-athletes. (B)(1) Any individual designated as a strength and conditioning coach by a public school or school district must be certified through a nationally recognized strength and conditioning program. This requirement applies to any person primarily responsible for developing, supervising, or leading strength and conditioning workouts. (2) If a school does not formally designate a strength and conditioning coach, any individual who conducts strength and conditioning workouts must hold such certification, except for individuals who conduct conditioning activities solely as part of regular sport practices. (3) For purposes of meeting the requirement in items (1) and (2), an individual must hold: (a) the National High School Strength Coaches Association (NHSSCA) High School Strength Coach Certification (HSSCC); or (b) another similar nationally recognized strength and conditioning certification designated by the State Department of Education. (4) In designating acceptable certifications under item (3)(b), the department shall consider whether the credential: (a) establishes a recognized professional standard for interscholastic strength and conditioning; (b) aligns training with the developmental needs of student-athletes; and (c) promotes research-based, consistent, and safe training practices across schools. (C)(1) A public school is eligible to receive any state-funded or district-funded athletic supplement designated for a strength and conditioning coach only if it employs at least one individual with a current, verifiable certification meeting requirements in subsection (B). (2) Certification must be active before any supplement is authorized or disbursed. (3) Schools without a certified strength and conditioning coach are not eligible for the supplement. (4) Schools may designate personnel to obtain the required certification; however, no supplement may be issued until certification is complete. (D)(1) The department shall, subject to appropriation, provide professional development funding to support required certification. (2) Funds may be used for: (a) the designated strength and conditioning coach at each public high school; and (b) any coach assigned to teach weight training, strength training, or sport-specific physical education courses. (3) The department shall publish procedures for reimbursement, documentation, and allowable expenses. (E) To implement the provisions of this section: (1) each public high school shall employ or designate at least one staff member to serve as a certified strength and conditioning coach; (2) individuals currently serving in this role at the time of enactment must obtain a qualifying certification within two months of assignment, or within a timeline established by the State Board of Education not to exceed six months; and (3) the department shall provide resources and guidance to assist schools in obtaining and maintaining certification. (F) Regarding oversight and compliance of the provisions of this section: (1) each district athletic director shall maintain a record of certified strength and conditioning personnel assigned to each school; (2) certification status must be reviewed annually as part of the district's athletic compliance process and reported to the department; and (3) schools must ensure timely certification renewal and report any staff changes affecting compliance. (G) A certified strength and conditioning coach shall: (1) implement safe, structured, and progressive training programs; (2) prioritize injury prevention and long-term athletic development; (3) provide equitable training opportunities for all sports and genders; (4) supervise all training environments and ensure equipment safety; and (5) coordinate with head coaches to meet sport-specific and seasonal needs. (H) The department shall review this section at least once every three years to ensure alignment with interscholastic athletic best practices and evolving national standards. (I)(1) Each public school shall submit an annual report to the department, in the manner and form prescribed by the department, that includes: (a) the names of all individuals who provided strength and conditioning coaching, instruction, or supervision to student-athletes during the school year; (b) proof of each individual's certification that demonstrates compliance with the requirements of subsection (B); (c) the role or capacity in which each individual provided strength and conditioning guidance; and (d) any additional information the department determines necessary for tracking compliance, maintaining the statewide registry, or ensuring program safety and quality. (2) Each school must submit the required report no later than August first following the end of each school year, unless the department establishes a different timeline. (3) School districts shall review and verify the accuracy of each school's report prior to submission to the department and shall ensure that all required information is complete. (4) Failure to submit accurate and timely information under this subsection shall constitute noncompliance for purposes of the district and state athletic compliance review processes. (5)(a) The department shall create and maintain an online, publicly accessible database that displays information reported by each public school regarding strength and conditioning personnel and certifications. The database must be: (i) organized by school, with a separate entry for each school; and (ii) posted on the department's website. (b) Each school entry in the database must include: (i) the names of all individuals who provided strength and conditioning coaching, instruction, or supervision to student-athletes during the reporting year; (ii) the type of certification held by each individual and whether it complies with subsection (B); (iii) the role or capacity in which each individual provided strength and conditioning services; and (iv) any other information the department considers necessary. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect on July 1, 2027. ----XX----